Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-715
Federal Home Loan Bank members; powers.

In addition to all other powers and investments authorized by law, any institution, upon becoming a member of a Federal Home Loan Bank, may (1) purchase stock in, (2) obtain advances from, (3) pledge collateral to, and (4) perform such acts which are necessary and required to make available to it all the advantages and privileges offered by such Federal Home Loan Bank to the extent provided by and in accordance with the Federal Home Loan Bank Act.

Laws 1937, c. 51, § 2, p. 214;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-602;

R.S.1943, § 8-715;

Laws 1991, LB 77, § 2.